Wyoming, session 2026, HB0089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 12-5-406 is created to read:

12-5-406. Furnishing of alcoholic beverages for
charitable purposes.

(a) With prior approval of the applicable licensing
authority, an industry representative or licensee may
donate or give alcoholic beverages to any person to support
HB0089

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0068
annual community or charitable events or to assist with the
person's fundraising efforts if the person receiving the
gift or donation:

(i) Is a nonprofit corporation organized under
the laws of this state;

(ii) Is qualified as a tax-exempt organization
under the Internal Revenue Code; and

(iii) Uses any proceeds or revenues generated
from the donated or gifted alcoholic beverages only for
charitable purposes.

(b) A gift or donation made by an industry
representative or licensee in accordance with this section
shall not constitute a sale.

Section 2. W.S. 12-5-402(a)(intro) is amended to
read:

HB0089

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0068
12-5-402. Furnishing of money and products; payment
in full for malt beverages; credit for alcoholic liquor;
credit deficiencies.

(a) Except as otherwise authorized in this section,
or W.S. 12-5-403 or 12-5-406, industry representatives
shall not furnish, give or lend money or other things of
value, directly or indirectly, to any person engaged in
selling products of the industry at retail under privileges
of a license or permit to sell any beverage or liquor in
Wyoming. The prohibition shall extend to the giving to any
person for the use, benefit or relief of the person engaged
in selling the industry's products and to prohibit guaranty
by the industry of a loan or other financial obligation of
persons engaged at retail in selling these products. With
prior approval of the applicable licensing authority, malt
beverage industry representatives may furnish, give or lend
money or other things of value to a licensee to support
annual community events open to the public if the licensee:

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0089